Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407.20
Benefits not equal to minimum nonforfeiture amount; statement; when.

Any contract which does not provide cash surrender benefits or does not provide death benefits at least equal to the minimum nonforfeiture amount prior to the commencement of any annuity payments shall include a statement in a prominent place in the contract that such benefits are not provided.

Laws 1979, LB 354, § 16.